Utah statutes.
41-12a-505.   Effect upon nonresident of use of state highways.
(1) (a)  The use and operation by a nonresident or his agent, or of a resident
who has departed Utah, of a motor vehicle on Utah highways is an appointment
of the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code as the true and lawful
attorney for service of legal process in any action or proceeding against the
person arising from the use or operation of a motor vehicle over Utah highways
which use or operation results in damages or loss to person or property.
(b)  The use or operation referenced in Subsection (1) is an agreement that
process shall, in any action against the person in which there is such
service, be of the same legal force and validity as if served upon him
personally in Utah.
(2) (a)  Service of process under Subsection (1) is made by serving a copy
upon the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code or by filing a copy in
that office with payment of a reasonable fee.
(b)  The plaintiff shall, within ten days after service of process, send
notice of the process together with plaintiff's affidavit of compliance with
this section to the defendant by registered mail at the defendant's last-known
address.
(3) (a)  The court in which the action is pending may order any continuance
necessary to afford the defendant reasonable opportunity to defend the action,
but not exceeding 90 days from the date of filing the action in court.
(b)  The reasonable fee paid by the plaintiff to the  Division of Corporations
and Commercial Code is taxed as costs if the plaintiff prevails.
(c)  The division shall keep a record of all process served showing the day
and hour of service.
